Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB160.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2(5) of the act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act, is amended to read:Section 2. Definitions.--As used in this act--* * *(5) "Public work" means construction, reconstruction, demolition, alteration and/or repair work other than maintenance work, done under contract and paid for in whole or in part out of the funds of a public body where the estimated cost of the total project is in excess of [twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000)] two hundred fifty-seven thousand dollars ($257,000) as adjusted on March 1 of each year to conform to increases or 12345678910111213141516171819 decreases in the Consumer Price Index as published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics for the previous calendar year for urban wage earners in the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area combined, but shall not include work performed under a rehabilitation or manpower training program.* * *Section 2. The amendment of section 2(5) of the act shall apply to contracts entered into on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0160PN0118 - 2 - 1234567891011